Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-903
Agency; rules and regulations; publish.

Each agency shall cause its rules and regulations to be published in such manner as the agency shall determine to bring, as far as practicable, the existence and scope of the rules and regulations to the attention of all persons affected thereby.

Laws 1945, c. 255, § 3, p. 795;

Laws 1987, LB 253, § 3.